lib/hunspell-1.2.10/src/tools/dics/si_LK/dictionaries/si-LK.dic
අතිශයෝක්තියට/223
අද්දා/63,2353
අවධානය/1,4,7,12,23,28,1796
ආකාරය/1,3,4,6,7,9,11,12,17,22,23,28,31,32,77,85,91,150,201,278,339,340,1143,1312,1970,2163
ආවේගය/1,4,1970
ඇට්ටි/4581
ඇමති/14,27,112,151,249,291,313,346,382,423,527,596,920,1092,1120,1384,2101,4939,4952
ඉඩහළ/712
උගුලට/223
උත්තේජන/19,2037
කුමර/20,24,42,129,155,262,279,762,763,1324,2237
කූඩු/10,26,30,36,37,45,54,536,3018,3452
ගැවසී/8,75,125,135,440,491,542,567,1310,3003
ගොඩනැංවීමට/223
ගෝවට/223
ටවුමට/8,223
තැබී/2,464,491,831,832,1310,4784
තිබී/1310,1516
නැටි/2,600,4944
නැසී/50,162,456,1310
නිගමන/2,13,19,43,60,62,3722
නියැලී/135,162,491,567,761,1310,4698,4892
නෙලා/63,358,518,1149
නෙලේ/26,2872,4192
පණමට/223
පරෙස්සමට/223
පැටලී/8,332,491,1310
පිදි/2,106,920,1514,2235
පුනර්ජීවන/13,2037
පෙරළි/2,13,19,21,43,48,53,708,920,1329,1833,2039
ප්‍රමානය/1004,1970
ප්‍රවාහන/2,15,19,60,2037,2595
බේරා/63,90,125,347,358,518,581,812,1268,2787,4949
මාගම/1797,4384
මැතිසබය/1,3,1796
මේරි/27,97,708,920
රවුමක/5,4703
ලේඛන/2,13,15,19,26,29,38,43,90,199,2037,2393,4143
සැරසී/1310,1516,4717
සැරැසී/135,1310
සිනාසී/761,1310,1331
සූදුවට/223
